District of Columbia statutes.
1-303.02

Publication of regulations; effective date.

The regulations provided for in § 1-303.01 and adopted prior to October 21, 1968, shall be printed in 1 or more of the daily newspapers published in the District of Columbia; and no penalty prescribed for the violation of said regulations shall be enforced until 30 days after such publication.

Jan. 26, 1887, 24 Stat. 369, ch. 49, § 2
Aug. 2, 1983, D.C. Law 5-24, § 19, 30 DCR 3341
Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-159, § 26, 32 DCR 30
Publication of laws and ordinances, see § 5-103.01.
This section is referenced in § 1-303.01 and § 1-303.03.
1981 Ed., § 1-318.
1973 Ed., § 1-225.